Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 3

Bylaws

43-38-301. Bylaws — Provisions —Amendments.

A cooperative shall have bylaws in writing governing the cooperative's business affairs, structure, the qualifications, classification, rights and obligations of members, and the classifications, allocations and distributions of membership interests.

The bylaws of a cooperative may be adopted or amended by the board of directors as provided in subsection (c), or at a regular or special members' meeting if:

The notice of the regular or special meeting contains a statement that the bylaws or restated bylaws will be voted upon and copies are included with the notice, or copies are available upon request from the cooperative and summary statement of the proposed bylaws or amendment is included with the notice;

A quorum is registered as being present or represented by mail or alternative voting method if the mail or alternative voting method is authorized by the board; and

The bylaws or amendment is approved by a majority vote cast, or, for a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring more than majority approval or other conditions for approval, the bylaws or amendment is approved by a proportion of the vote cast or a number of the total members as required by the articles or bylaws and the conditions for approval in the articles or bylaws have been satisfied.

Until the next annual or special members' meeting, the majority of directors may adopt and amend bylaws for the cooperative that are consistent with subsection (d). Bylaws may be further amended or repealed by the members at an annual or special members' meeting.

Bylaws may contain any provision relating to the management or regulation of the affairs of the cooperative that are not inconsistent with law or the articles, and shall include the following:

The number of directors, and the qualifications, manner of election, powers, duties, and compensation, if any, of directors;

The qualifications of members and any limitations on their number;

The manner of admission, withdrawal, suspensions, and expulsion of members; and

Generally, the governance rights, financial rights, assignability of governance and financial rights, and other rights, privileges and obligations of members and their membership interests, which may be further described in member control agreements.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 6.

43-38-302. Approval of and agreement to bylaws — Vote to amend — Enforcement.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles, the bylaws must initially be agreed to by all members or the organizer or organizers. Any person becoming a member after the bylaws have been adopted by the organizers or the members will be deemed to have agreed to the bylaws.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or the bylaws, the amendment of the bylaws shall require the vote of members necessary to amend the articles.

A court of equity may enforce the bylaws by injunction or by such other equitable relief as the court in its discretion determines to be fair and appropriate in the circumstances.

As an alternative to injunctive or other equitable relief, when § 43-38-1015 is applicable, a court of equity may conduct or continue the dissolution and winding up of the cooperative.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any agreement to give dissolution avoidance consent, whether or not contained in the articles, the bylaws or other agreement entered into before the event of dissolution, is not specifically enforceable.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 6.

43-38-303. Emergency bylaws.

Unless the article provides otherwise, the board of directors or the organizers of a cooperative may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency. The emergency bylaws, which are subject to amendment or repeal by the members, may make all provisions necessary for managing the cooperative during the emergency, including:

Procedures for calling a meeting of the board of directors;

Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

Designation of additional or substitute directors.

All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws remain effective during the emergency. The emergency bylaws are not effective after the emergency ends.

Action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws:

Binds the cooperative; and

May not be used to impose liability on a director, officer, employee or agent of the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 6.